lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/a.twolc
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 
%>:0 ;


Sets
Vow = a e o u i ;
Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;

Rules

"Sibilant plural"
0:e <=> [ s | z | s h | c h | \Vow y: ] _ %>: s ;

"Spy rule"
y:i <=> _ 0:e %>: s ;

!"Dummy rule"
!b:p <=> _ .#. ;
